Utah statutes.
76-10-304.   Marking of containers of explosives held for sale or use.

It shall be a class A misdemeanor to sell or offer for sale or take or solicit orders of sale, or purchase or use, or have on hand or in store for the purpose of sale or use, any giant, hercules, atlas, venture or any other high explosive containing nitroglycerin, unless on each box or package and wrapper containing any such high explosive there shall be plainly stamped or printed the name and place of business of the person, partnership, or corporation by whom or by which it was manufactured, and the exact and true date of its manufacture, and the percentage of nitroglycerin or other high explosive contained therein.

